src/fst/phonology.twolc
"ye to uá and uo, part 1"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  Part 1 of ye to uá for kyeli : kuálán  
y:u <=> _ e:  Cns:+  Vow:  [%^EA:|%^EX:] ([%^CSH:|%^CLEN:])                       (%^RLEN:)          [%>|.#.|#] ;  
        _ e:  Cns:+ [:Vow|i6:]    (%^CSH:|%^WG:) (%^CLEN:)        %^VHIGH:       ([%^RLEN:|%^RVSH:]) [%>|.#.|#] ;  ! RV 
        _ :o  Cns:+ :i                   (%^WG:) (%^CLEN:) ([%^VBACK:|%^VHIGH:]) ([%^RLEN:|%^RVSH:])  %> [i:|j|i3:|š|ž] ; !! syej%^RCi%^RVSH%^CLEN%>in
        _ :o  Cns:+ :i                   (%^WG:) (%^CLEN:)        %^VBACK:       ([%^RLEN:|%^RVSH:])  %> [m|h] ;  
        _ :o  Cns:+ [â:|á|u2:] (Cns:+) ([%^WG:|%^CSH:]) (%^CLEN:) %^VBACK:        [%^RLEN:|%^RVSH:]  [%>|.#.|#] ; !! [i|Cns]; ryettâ^WG^VBACK^RLEN>m
        _ :o  Cns:+ :i                    %^WG:   %^CLEN:         %^SVLOW:                            %>  i: ; 
        _ :o  Cns:  Cns: :i               %^WG:   %^CLEN:                                  %^RVSH:    %> [i:|i3:] ; 
        _ :o  Cns:+ i2:i                                                                              %> [i|i3:i|Cns] ;  ! RV 
        _ :o  Cns:+ â                     %^WG:  # ;

!!€ ryettâ^WG#škyett4
!!€ ruo0tâ0#škye0t

"ye to uá, part 2"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  Part 2 of ye to uá for kyeli : kuálán
e:á <=> y: _  Cns:+ [Vow: - u2:] [%^EA:|%^EX:] (%^CSH:|%^CLEN:|%^WG:)              (%^RLEN:) [%>|.#.] \[i:|j|i3:| š | ž ] ;
        y: _  Cns:+ [u:|á|o|â2:]               (%^CSH:|%^WG:) (%^CLEN:) (%^VHIGH:) (%^RLEN:) [%>|.#.] \[l|i] ;  !! not ryetáim:
        y: _  Cns:+ i6:                                                  %^VHIGH:            [%>|.#.] \[l|i] ;  !! not ryetáim:
        y: _  Cns:+ u2:o Triggers:* [%>|.#.]  ;  ! RV  ! not ryetáim:

!!€ kyel^RCi3^EA^CLEN>m
!!€ kuállá00>m

"ye to uo, part 2"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  Part 2 of ye to uá for kyeli : kuolijn
e:o <=> y: _  Cns:+ :i (%^WG:)                        (%^CLEN:) (%^VBACK:) ([%^RLEN:|%^RVSH:]) %> [i:|j|i3:|š|ž] ;
        y: _  Cns:+ :i (%^WG:)                        (%^CLEN:)  %^VBACK:  ([%^RLEN:|%^RVSH:]) %> [m|h] ;  
        y: _  Cns:+ [â:|á ] (Cns:+)  ([%^WG:|%^CSH:]) (%^CLEN:)  %^VBACK:   [%^RLEN:|%^RVSH:] [%>|.#.|#] ; ![i|Cns]; ryettâ^WG^VBACK^RLEN>m
        y: _  Cns:+ :i                 %^WG:           %^CLEN:                     %^SVLOW:    %>  i: ; ! RV 
        y: _  Cns: Cns: :i             %^WG:           %^CLEN:                         %^RVSH: %> [i:|i3:]  ;
        y: _  Cns:+ i2:i                      %> [i|i3:i|Cns]  ;  ! RV 
        y: _  Cns:+  u2:u  Triggers:*         %>  ;  ! RV 
        y: _  Cns:+ â                  %^WG:  # ;

!!€ lyei4kk4â^WG^VBACK^RLEN#škyett4
!!€ luoi0hâ000#škye0t

"uá to ye and uo to ye, part 1"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  Part 1 luámmán : lyeme čuággás%^ÁI%^WG%^RLEN%>
u:y <=> _ á: Cns:+ á: (%^SV:) [l|m:|s|n:|r] [%^ÁI:|%^ÁE:] (%^FCD:) %^WG: [%^RLEN:|%^RVSH:] ([%^SVSH:|%^SLEN:]) [%>|.#.] ; ! RV 
        _ o: Cns:+ [e ([%^WG:|%^CLEN:]) %> e|i %^CSH: %> h] ; ! RV 

!!€ vuolle^CLEN>en
!!€ vyelle0>en

"uá to ye, part 2"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  Part 2 luámmán : lyeme
á:e <=> [:y|o] _ Cns:+ á: (%^SV:) [l|m:|s:|n:|r] [%^ÁI:|%^ÁE:] (%^FCD:) %^WG:  [%^RLEN:|%^RVSH:] ([%^SVSH:|%^SLEN:]) [%>|.#.] ; ! RV  !cuággás : cyegis čuággás%^ÁI%^WG%^RLEN

"uo to ye, part 2"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  vyelleen, vyeleem,vyelih
o:e <=> u:y _ Cns:+ [e ([%^WG:|%^CLEN:]) %> e|i %^CSH: %> h] ; ! RV 




!! ### Second syllable rules

"Second syllable vowel change á to e or i in 3syll stems"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** = puttás- > putes, triggers are ^ÁE and ^ÁI já%^RVhhá%^SVl%^ÁI%^WG%^RLEN%> pu5árrás%^ÁI%^WG%>umos
Vx:Vy <=> Cns: _ (%^SV:) (Cns:)  Vz: (%^FCD:) %^WG: (%^CLEN:) ([%^RVSH:|%^RLEN:]) ([%^SVSH:|%^SLEN:])  [.#.|%> [#|⎈|i n|i d|n|d]] ;  ! SV  !no change when the word is added a new foot  \Syll 
          Cns: Vx: _ s  Vz: %^WG: ; !lohhes
       where Vx in ( á    á    a   )
             Vy in ( e    i    e   )
             Vz in ( %^ÁE %^ÁI %^ÁE) 
       matched ;

!! *Test:*
!!€ puttás^ÁE^WG>
!!€ pu0tes00>

! sollâ
"Stemvowel shortening  áá and aa to e or i in 3syll"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** = puttás- > putes, triggers are ^ÁE and ^ÁI
Vx:0 <=> Cns: _ Vx: (Cns:) Vz: %^WG: ;  ! SV  !!!!!%^CSH:
       where Vx in ( á    á    a   )
             Vz in ( %^ÁE %^ÁI %^ÁE) 
       matched ;

!! *Tests:*
!rejected?
!!€ nahha^SVr^ÁE^WG^RLEN>
!!€ na0ve0r000>
!!€ nahha^SVr^ÁE^WG^RLEN
!!€ na0ve0r000

! nahha^SVr^ÁE^WG^RLEN

 
"Stem vowel e to a for a root vowel."
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  alge to aalgan
e:a <=> a (%^RV:) Cns:+ _ (%^SV:) %^EA: ([%^CSH:| %^CLEN:|%^WG:]) (%^RLEN:) (%^SLEN:) [%>|.#.] ; ! SV 

!! *Tests:*
!!€ a^RVlge^SV^EA^SLEN>š
!!€ a0lgaa00>š
!!€ a^RVlge^SV^EA^SLEN
!!€ a0lgaa00
!!€ a^RVlge^EA^CSH^RLEN>n
!!€ aalga000>n
!!€ va^RVh^RCe^SV^EA^CLEN^SLEN>m
!!€ va0hhaa000>m

"Stem vowel e to á for other root vowel"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  if e stem
e:á <=> [o|i|u] (%^RV:) Cns:+ _ (%^SV:) %^EA: ([%^CSH:| %^CLEN: |%^WG:]) ([%^RLEN: |%^RVSH:]) (%^SLEN:)  [%>|.#.] ;  ! SV !njuunáád

"Stem vowel i to á for other root vowel."
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  e.g. säämi > Ill sáámán 
Vx:á <=> [:e|:i|:ä|:á|ä:0] (%^RV:) Cns:+ _ %^EA: ([%^CSH:|%^WG:]) (%^CLEN:) ([%^RLEN:|%^RVSH:]) [%>|.#.] [á|i5:|i:|n|d|m|s|š|ž] ; !! SV uábbám iännásis
    where Vx in ( i i2 i3 ) ;
    
! +N+Sg+Ill:^EA^WG%>žán K ; piäivážân
! +Sg+Ill:^EA^CSH^RLEN%>n K ; 
! +N+Sg+Com:^EA^CLEN%>i5n K ; 


"Stem vowel i to â for other root vowel, as a common error."
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  e.g. säämi > Ill Err/Orth sáámân 
Vx:â <=> [:e|:i|:ä|:á|ä:0] (%^RV:)  Cns:+ _   %^EX: ([%^CSH:|%^WG:]) (%^CLEN:) ([%^RLEN: |%^RVSH:])  [%>|.#.] [á|i:|n|d|m|s|š|ž] ;  ! SV !uábbám iännásis
    where Vx in ( i i2 i3 ) ;


"Stem vowel i to e in front of j"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  
Vx:e <=> Cns _ %> [j [Vow - â]|e] ; ! SV  !not hit karri>jân ! 
	where Vx in (i i2) ;


! kalgá -> kalga

"Stem vowel â to a in Pl Nom -h"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  silbâ to siilbah  %^WG%^RLEN%>hlove%>h
â:a <=> :Cns (%^RC:) _  TriggersnotFCVD:* %> h [l | .#.|%>] ; ! SV 


!!€ so^RVllâ^WG^RLEN>h
!!€ soo0la00>h

"Stem vowel â to á change before i"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** = sollâ to sooláid 
â:á <=> _ (%^SV:) (%^WG:) (%^RLEN:|%^CLEN:|%^SLEN:) %^SVLOW: %> [:i|:j] ;  ! SV 


!!€ so^RVllâ^WG^RLEN^SVLOW>in 
!!€ soo0lá000>in

"Stem vowel â to e change before e"
â:e <=> _ (%^WG:) (%^RLEN:|%^CLEN:|%^SLEN:) %^SVLOW: %> e ;  ! SV 

"Optional stem vowel â to e change before e"
!â:e  =>  _ [l l | d d | t :t ] [ e %> [e|h] | i %> [m|h|i3:]] ; 
â:e  <=>  _ [l: l | d: d | t: :t ] [ e (%^CSH:) %^IUML: %> [e|h] | i %^IUML: %> [m|h|i3:]] ; 


! posâlâdd>eh
! posâlâddeh/posâleddeh
! hámiin prs d1 (een), p3 (eh)
!        prt s1 (im), s2 (ih), p3 (ii)
! galgá leat sihke e ja â 3. stávvalis

        
!"Stem vowel i3:e"
! * __@RULENAME@__ = 
!i3:e <=> _   %^WG: %^RVSH:  .#.   ; ! SV  !kyele
!i3:e <=>  _  (%^SV:) [Triggers: - %^EA:]+  %>  [t |h|s|e]  ; ! SV  !hyeneest

"Stem vowel i3:0"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** = 
i3:0 <=> _  e (e) Triggers:*  [.#.|#|%>] ; ! SV  !kyele temp løsning



"Stem vowel u:o change before suffix"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  
u:o <=> Cns: _  (%^SV:) ([š|ž]) (%^WG:) (%^CLEN:) (%^RLEN:|%^RVSH:) (%^SLEN:) %^SVLOW: ; !! 1) olmooš, olmožin
 		Cns  _  %> [ j Vow | o ] ; !! 2) 


"Stem vowel u2:o change before suffix"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  
u2:o <=> Cns: _ Triggers:* %> [j Vow|o] ; !! SVLOW together with u?
 		
!!€ uáinu>o
!!€ uáino>o


 		
! stáálu stááloust

"Second vowel shortening"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** = eemeed : emedân, savvoon : savo 
Vx:0 <=> _ Vx: (Cns:+) (%^FCD:) (%^CSH:|%^WG:) ([%^RLEN:|%^RVSH:]) %^SVSH: ; !! eemeed : emedân sai4joos
    where Vx in ( e o a á u i y ä ) ;

	
!! **Tests**
!!€ kulluutt^SVSH>
!!€ kull0u0t0>
!!€ eemeed^CSH^SVSH>ân
!!€ e0m0ed00>ân
!!€ kappeer^CSH^SVSH>ân
!!€ ka0p0er00>ân


"Causative i deletion"
i2:0 <=> Cns: _ %> i3: Cns:+ %^SVSH: ;

!!€ feeri2>i3tt^SVSH
!!€ feer0>itt0

"Stem vowel:0 in front of â"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** = aiguu:aaigâ
Vx:0 <=> Cns: _ ([%^ÁE:|%^ÁI:])                     â Cns:* Triggers:* [%>|.#.] ; 
          \%> _ (%^SV:) Cns: ([%^ÁE:|%^ÁI:]) %^FCD: â Cns:* Triggers:* [%>|.#.] ;  
    where Vx in ( â e o a á u i y ä) ;

! this rule should be generalised, we talk about a ban on o>u strings

"Stem â deleting"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** = kandâ:kandii
â:0 <=> \%> _ i [j|i] (%^WG:) (%^RVSH:) [%>|.#.]  ;
        \%> _ i  Triggers:*              %>  :i ; 


! This test is wrong, it fails, but the form is correct: juvvii	juuvâš+N+Sg+Gen
! ju^RVh^RCâi^WG^CLEN>i
! ju0vv0i00>i

!!€ a^RVlgâi^FVD^WG^CLEN>i5
!!€ a0lg0i000>i

!! ### Suffix vowel rules

"Suffix vowel lengthening"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** = long á in kissáást, nuorâ : nuorááin, hyeni:hyeneest
%^SV:Vx <=> :Vx (%^CLEN:) (%^VHIGH:|%^VBACK:) (%^RVSH:) (%>)  _ (Cns)  NotSuffixBorder:* %^SLEN:   ;  ! SV ! hyeneest
       where Vx in ( á o u e a i   y ä  ) ; !nuorâ : nuorááin


!! **Tests**
!!€ ki^RVssá^SV^WG^CLEN^SLEN>st
!!€ ki0ssáá000>st
!!€ mi^RVllo^SV^WG^CLEN^SLEN>st
!!€ mi0lloo000>st
!!€ huksi^SVm^SLEN>ist
!!€ huksiim0>ist
!!€ táál^RCu^SV^WG^RVSH^SLEN^SVLOW>st
!!€ táál0oo0000>st

"Suffix i5:j for lexicon APINA"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** = salijn
i5:j  <=> Cns: i %> _ ; ! SV 


"Suffix i5:0 and i5ä:e"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** = *timotein oboen*, not *Chariliein*
i5:0 <=> o  e %> _ ;  ! SUFF
		 Vow i  %> _ ;! SUFF
!         Cns _ ä:e Cns: Cns:+ Vow: s %^ÁE: %^WG: %^RVSH: [%>|.#.]  ; !pi5ällás%^ÁE


"Suffix i:j for i and e-stems"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  
i:j <=> [i: | e: | i2: | i3: ] Triggers:*   %> _ [l|d|n|m|g|t|%>|.#.|#];  ! SUFF


"Vowel copy in suffix"
%^VO:Vx <=> :Vx Triggers:* %> _ ; ! SUFF
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  for imperative Sg3, at least
	where Vx in ( a á i u o ) ;


!! ### Suffix consonant rules

"Adjective illative in -vân after u"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  
j:v <=> u u:  %> _ â n ; ! SUFF

"Shortening u for vân illative"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  
u:0 <=>      u _  %> :v ; ! SV
        u2: %> _ Cns:+ %^SVSH: ;

!!€ hárdu2>utt^SVSH
!!€ hárd0>utt0


!! ## Other rules

"Word final vowel deletion"
!!  **RULE: @RULENAME@** = for vaskâm:vaaskâ
Vx:0 <=> _  %^FVD: (%^WG:|%^CSH:) (%^CLEN:) (i) [.#.|%>] ;  ! SC
          where Vx in (â i);

!! *Tests:*
!!€ sollâ^FVD>ii
!!€ soll00>ii

!!€ a^RVlgâ^FVD^WG^CLENi>
!!€ a0lg0000i>i


"Potential vowel shortening for contract verbs"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  -áážep becomes -áš etc.
Vx:0 <=> Vx _ %> š [.#.|v|j] ; ! SV
	where Vx in (a á i o u ) ;


"Insertion of pleonastic hyphen"
!!  **RULE: @RULENAME@** = for compounding of two vowels *stovli-ijâ*
%#:%- <=> Vx _ :Vx ;! HYPH
    where Vx in (a e i o u ä á) ;


!! *Tests:*
!!€ skä^RVi4nâ^VBACK>đ
!!€ ska0inâ0>đ
!!€ hu^RVm^RCo^SVb^WG^RLEN^SLEN^RLEN^SLEN
!!€ huum0oob00000
